Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB605.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.14-020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(2) ["Commission" means the GRANT Commission established in KRS 154.14-080;
(3) ]"County population ranking" means the score of each county determined by the cabinet under KRS 154.14-
050(7);
(3)[(4)] "Eligible grant applicant[recipient]" means[ a grant applicant that is] a county or city governing body,
any entity organized in Kentucky providing public services through law enforcement, fire, emergency
medical, rescue, waterfront development, a water utility, or a waste water utility to persons domiciled in
Kentucky, or a nonprofit charitable organization organized under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3) and engaged in
public benefit improvements;
(4)[(5)] "Eligible project" means a project that:
(a) Meets the requirements for a federal grant offered or administered by a qualifying federal entity that:
1. Requires a local match; or
2. Is a Delta Regional Authority project that includes language explicitly stating that a local
match will make an application more competitive;
(b) Benefits the public or substantially benefits the public and satisfies the evaluation criteria in KRS
154.14-050 and that is initiated on:
1. Publicly owned property;
2. Property to be acquired, which comes with either a:
a. Legally binding letter of intent or option for the sale to an eligible grant
applicant[recipient]; or
b. Legally binding sale agreement for the sale to an eligible grant applicant[recipient]; or
3. Private property on which a project is located that is in the public interest and for a public
purpose and that benefits an eligible community; and
(c)[(b)] Requires local matching funds based on the county population ranking as provided in KRS
154.14-050;
(5)[(6)] "Eligible use" means the authorized purpose for which an awarded grant may be used depending on the
source of funds from the federal government[Commonwealth];
(6) "GRANT Program" means the Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program
established in Section 2 of this Act;
(7) "GRANT Program fund" means the fund established in Section 5 of this Act["Interagency Working Group"
means the Interagency Working Group on Coal and Power Plant Communities and Economic Revitalization
established by Presidential Executive Order 14008, issued on January 27, 2021];
(8) "Population density":
(a) Means the number of persons per square mile of a county;
(b) Is calculated by dividing the total county population by the square miles in the county;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Is determined by using the population estimate from the most recent available five (5) year American
Community Survey as published by the United States Census Bureau; and
(d) Is used to rank each county in descending order, with the county having the largest population density
receiving a rank of one (1) and the county with the smallest population density receiving a rank of one
hundred twenty (120);
(9) "Qualifying federal entity" includes the following:
(a) The Domestic Policy Council;
(b) The Office of Management and Budget;
(c) The United States Department of Energy;
(d) The United States Department of the Treasury;
(e) The United States Department of the Interior;
(f) The United States Department of Agriculture;
(g) The United States Department of Commerce;
(h) The United States Department of Labor;
(i) The United States Department of Health and Human Services;
(j) The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;
(k) The United States Department of Transportation;
(l) The United States Department of Education;
(m) The United States Department of Homeland Security;
(n) The United States Environmental Protection Agency;
(o) The United States Department of the Army;
(p) The Appalachian Regional Commission;
(q) The Delta Regional Authority;
(r) The National Science Foundation; and
(s) Any federal agency, department, or entity that is the successor of an entity listed in paragraphs (a) to
(r) of this subsection;
(10) "Regional project" means an eligible project that is proposed by eligible grant applicants[recipients] residing
or having a primary business address in different counties in this Commonwealth or by eligible grant
subrecipients as part of a multistate project who submit a regional[single] grant application; and
(11)[(10)] "Ten (10) year percentage change in population":
(a) Means the percentage change in population within a county;
(b) Is determined by comparing the population estimate from the most recent available five (5) year
American Community Survey as published by the United States Census Bureau to the same survey ten
(10) years prior to the most recent available survey; and
(c) Is used to rank each county in descending order, with the county having the largest positive percentage
change in population receiving a rank of one (1) and the county with the largest negative percentage
change receiving a rank of one hundred twenty (120).
Section 2. KRS 154.14-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program[ of 2024] is hereby established
under the cabinet[, subject to the approval of the commission established in KRS 154.14-080]. The cabinet's
administration of the program includes but is not limited to the following:
(a) Creating and making available a standardized grant application and a regional grant application for the
obligation of state funds under this subchapter to apply for matching federal funds;
(b) Developing a standardized scoring system pursuant to this section and KRS 154.14-050;

CHAPTER 71 3
(c) Reviewing and processing [the ]applications submitted to the cabinet by[ the proposed] eligible grant
applicants[recipients to the cabinet];
(d) Verifying that[and determining whether a match applicant is] an eligible grant applicant[recipient that]
is seeking a federal grant for an eligible project;
(e) Evaluating the project proposed by the match application in accordance with the evaluation criteria set
forth in this section and KRS 154.14-050;[.]
(f) Scoring each [match ]application pursuant to the scoring system described in KRS 154.14-050;
(g) Ranking each match application:
1. To prioritize the greatest return on investment and relative positive impact of the eligible project;
and
2. Based on the project evaluation and the project score described in this section and KRS 154.14-
050;[.]
(h) Identifying eligible grant[Compiling a list of proposed match] applicants whose eligible project
demonstrates a high level of investment potential if a match is provided, as revealed by the evaluation,
scoring, and county population ranking process described in this section and KRS 154.14-050;
(i) Providing detailed feedback to the eligible grant[match] applicants after the project evaluation and
project score are completed and the [match ]application is approved or denied by the cabinet, unless
otherwise prohibited by federal or state law;
(j) Obligating matching funds to selected eligible grant applicants[recipients]; and
(k) Compiling the monthly and annual reports[report] to be submitted under KRS 154.14-070[; and
(l) Compiling the annual report to be submitted under KRS 154.14-070].
(2) The cabinet shall determine the terms, conditions, and requirements of grant awards from the GRANT
Program[application for match funds awarded from the Government Resources Accelerating Needed
Transformation Program of 2024] fund. The cabinet may establish procedures and standards for the review and
approval of the obligation of match funds through the promulgation of administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A[. By December 1, 2024, the cabinet shall submit recommended legislative
changes to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to and for consideration by the Senate Standing
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the House Standing Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue or the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue].
(3) The secretary of the cabinet shall have the authority to hire staff, contract for services, expend funds, and
operate the normal business activities of the GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed
Transformation Program of 2024]. Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 45A, the cabinet may contract with a third
party for implementation and administration of the program.
(4) The GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024 as
provided in this subchapter] shall sunset on December 31, 2026, unless authorized by the General Assembly to
continue its work for a specified period of time.
(5) The Kentucky Council of Area Development Districts and local area development districts shall assist eligible
grant applicants[recipients] in identifying available federal grant opportunities and preparing federal grant
applications and GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of
2024] applications. [Nothing in ]This subsection shall not prevent any public agency or nonprofit entity from
assisting eligible grant applicants[recipients] in identifying available federal grant opportunities and preparing
federal grant applications and GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation
Program of 2024] applications.
(6) Upon request of the local area development districts, a local public institution in the postsecondary education
system as defined in KRS 164.001 shall assist the eligible grant applicants[recipients] in their area by
including but not limited to:
(a) Identifying opportunities for federal grants;
(b) Rendering supplemental support for federal grant applications on behalf of the communities including
but not limited to providing data and analysis for the federal grant application; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Acting as the contact person for the local public institution to the Kentucky Council of Area
Development Districts and to the area development district in which the local public institution is
located and updating the contact person information.
Section 3. KRS 154.14-040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) To participate in the GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation
Program of 2024], eligible grant applicants shall submit either a standardized or a regional grant
application to the cabinet[ for consideration by the commission].
(b) The cabinet shall review applications monthly. Each monthly review shall include all applications
submitted but not yet reviewed by the first day of each month.
(c) The cabinet shall provide a preliminary evaluation of each application submitted by the first day of the
month[the application] within fourteen (14) calendar[five (5) business] days of the first day of the
month[receipt of the application]. As part of the preliminary evaluation, the cabinet shall consider the
applicant's eligibility and the application[the following:
1. Applicant's eligibility when evaluated against the requirements of the federal grant; and
2. Application] completeness when evaluated against the requirements of the federal grant.
(d)[(c)] The cabinet shall provide a final decision of approval or denial on the application by the last day
of the month in which the application was preliminarily reviewed. If an application is denied, the
cabinet may provide feedback about any possible corrective action, in which case the applicant may
resubmit the application for reconsideration after taking the recommended corrective action[within
twenty-one (21) calendar days of receipt of the application].
(2) If a grant application is approved, the recipient[selected as an eligible match recipient approved under this
subchapter, it] shall comply with any match [agreement ]and reporting requirements established[deemed
necessary] by the cabinet to verify that the awarded funds will be or have been expended on[to go toward] an
eligible use.
(3) The obligation of funds for an approved project shall not remain obligated longer than twelve (12) months
for that project. An approved project may receive a six (6) month extension of this deadline from the
cabinet.
(4) If the grant[selected match] recipient fails to comply with subsection (2) of this section or uses the awarded
funds[match money] for any purpose other than an eligible use, the grant[selected eligible match] recipient
shall forfeit and be liable to the cabinet for the full award amount.
Section 4. KRS 154.14-050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [The cabinet shall identify and certify the areas for grant funding designated by the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development, Delta Regional Authority, or Interagency Working Group as a priority
for obligation of match funds. Any area in Kentucky that is eligible for federal grant resources but is not a
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, a Delta Regional Authority, or an Interagency
Working Group designated community, may be eligible for obligation of state funds under this section. ]The
cabinet shall not approve a project unless it finds that the project is in the public interest and the grant funds
will be used for a public purpose. For purposes of this subsection, projects that are in the public interest and for
a public purpose can include a derivative private benefit, if the cabinet finds the following:
(a) The project will enhance a community or region;
(b) The granting entity for which the cabinet's matching grant is being used requires a public purpose for
grant eligibility; or
(c) The cabinet in its judgment concludes the proposal will enhance the quality of life or services in a
community or region.
(2) The cabinet shall evaluate each applicant's eligible project according to the criteria described in this section for
the purpose of compiling a [recommendation and ]score for the eligible project pursuant to this section.
(3) If a match applicant is selected as an eligible grant applicant[recipient] approved under the GRANT
Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024], it shall comply with
any incentive agreements and reporting requirements deemed necessary by the cabinet to verify that the
awarded grant shall go toward an eligible use.

CHAPTER 71 5
(4) In the administration of the GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation
Program of 2024], the cabinet shall develop a scoring system for eligible grant applications[the project
proposed by each match applicant] based on the total projected return on investment and the relative positive
impact in the community.
(5) The scoring system shall include a:
(a) Score in each category as specified in subsection (6) of this section; and
(b) Total weighted score, which is the average of the scores in each category.
(6) The scoring categories shall include but are not limited to:
(a) Projected return on investment the project will yield, which includes an assessment of the:
1. Likelihood of project completion both with the match[cabinet's] funding and without;
2. Application content when evaluated against the federal grant program's publicly available
scoring rubric or evaluation criteria, if any;
3. Projected gross economic impact of the proposed project on the community;
4. Projected number of jobs created by the proposed project and subsequent impact on the
community;
5. Determination of the cost of the project based on the amount[cost] expended by the cabinet if it
obligates the requested grant amount to the applicant;
6. Evidence of community support for the project submitted by:
a. The eligible grant applicant; or
b. A majority of eligible grant applicants for a regional project;
7. Likelihood that the applicant can successfully manage the federal grant's administration
requirements; and
8. Likelihood of success based on a federal agency prioritization of a particular applicant; and
(b) Overall positive impact the project will have on the surrounding community as evidenced by clear and
feasible projected outcomes of the grant-funded project.
(7) (a) On or before May 1, 2024, and not later than May 1 every two (2) years thereafter, the cabinet shall
determine a county population ranking for each county by adding the following two (2) factors:
1. The population density ranking; and
2. The ten (10) year percentage change in population ranking.
(b) The required local match for each county shall be as follows:
1. Eligible projects in counties where the county population ranking is greater than or equal to one
hundred ninety-three (193) shall provide a minimum amount of local matching funds equal to
one percent (1%) of the state match;
2. Eligible projects in counties where the county population ranking is less than one hundred
ninety-three (193) but greater than or equal to one hundred forty-five (145) shall provide a
minimum amount of local matching funds equal to two percent (2%) of the state match;
3. Eligible projects in counties where the county population ranking is less than one hundred forty-
five (145) but greater than or equal to ninety-seven (97) shall provide a minimum amount of
local matching funds equal to three percent (3%) of the state match;
4. Eligible projects in counties where the county population ranking is less than ninety-seven (97)
but greater than or equal to forty-nine (49) shall provide a minimum amount of local matching
funds equal to four percent (4%) of the state match; and
5. Eligible projects in counties where the county population ranking is less than forty-nine (49)
shall provide a minimum amount of local matching funds equal to five percent (5%) of the state
match.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) On or before November 1, 2024, and no later than November 1 every two (2) years thereafter, the
cabinet shall report to the Legislative Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriation and Revenue the following information for each county:
1. The county name;
2. The population density ranking for that county;
3. The ten (10) year percentage change in population ranking for that county; and
4. The county population ranking for that county.
(8) (a) For selected eligible grant applicants[recipients] that are involved in a regional project, the cabinet may
pool the potential allocation of funds available for each county represented by the eligible grant
applicants[recipients] for the grant amount awarded.
(b) A county that is an eligible grant applicant[recipient] involved in a regional project shall provide that
county's local matching funds based on the county population ranking determined under subsection (7)
of this section and each county's local matching funds may be pooled as described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection[.
(9) Beginning no later than November 1, 2024, and annually thereafter until the authorized appropriation is spent
or returned, the cabinet shall compile and submit a report for each application approved by the GRANT
Commission established in KRS 154.14-080 for the Government Resources Accelerating Needed
Transformation Program of 2024. The report shall be electronically delivered to the Legislative Research
Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and contain the following
information:
(a) The name of the applicant, a description of the eligible project, and the location of each proposed
project for which an application was approved;
(b) The date the application was approved by the GRANT Commission;
(c) The amount of funding authorized for each project approved;
(d) The total amount of funding disbursed for each project approved; and
(e) The round of funding for which each project received approval.
(10) The Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024 shall begin April 15, 2024.
The cabinet shall begin accepting applications for the program on May 15, 2024].
Section 5. KRS 154.14-060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be known as the GRANT
Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024] fund. The fund shall
consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered and maintained by the cabinet.
(3) (a) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for awarding:
1.[(a)] Matching funds to successful applicants of the GRANT Program[Government Resources
Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024] upon notification of award of the federal
grant requiring matching funds. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, up to
twenty percent (20%) of the amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for match awards for
nonprofit charitable organizations organized under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3); and
2.[(b)] Matching funds to successful applicants of the GRANT Program[Government Resources
Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024] upon notification of award of the federal
grant requiring matching funds. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, up to
eighty percent (80%) of the amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for match awards to
county or city governing bodies.
(b) The cabinet may transfer up to ten percent (10%) of funds remaining in one (1) of the categories
listed in paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection to the other category in that paragraph if:
1. The upper limit established is reached within a category;
2. There are eligible projects to be funded from the category that has reached the limit; and

CHAPTER 71 7
3. Funds remain available in the other category.
If a transfer is made, the cabinet shall provide notice in writing to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue if the transfer is made during an interim between legislative sessions, or
the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the House Standing Committee
on Appropriations and Revenue if the transfer is made during a legislative session.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys in the account not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse
but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.
(6)[ Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section and shall not be
appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly for any other purposes.
(7)] Any match funds awarded under subsection (3) of this section shall be canceled upon denial of the federal
award[.
(8) On or after June 30, 2024, any unencumbered moneys in the fund established in KRS 147A.158 shall be
transferred to the Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024 fund
administered by the Cabinet for Economic Development created in this section].
Section 6. KRS 154.14-070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) By June 1, 2024, and the first day of each month thereafter, the cabinet shall submit a [monthly ]report
on eligible project applications to the Governor and the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations
and Revenue and the House Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, or the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, and make the reports available on the cabinet's website.
(b) The monthly report shall be a summary of the eligible project applications and shall include but not be
limited to the following:
1. A list of all eligible grant applications received[match applicants];
2. The identity of applicants who were not selected for the obligation of [match ]funds;
3. Trends found in feedback given to applicants who were not selected for the obligation of [match
]funds;
4. For each submitted eligible grant application:
a. The eligible use of funds and project for which funds are requested[Eligible uses of the
projects cited in the match applications];
b.[5.] The date of submission[the application;
6. The date of receipt of the application by the cabinet];
c.[7.] A description of the federal grant funds applied for by the applicant;
d.[8.] A description of the title, subject matter, preliminary evaluation, and scoring tally of the
eligible grant application[project];
e.[9.] The date of the cabinet's preliminary evaluation;
f.[10.] The amount [of moneys ]requested, and the amount [of moneys ]approved or denied[ for
each application]; and
g.[11.] The date of the cabinet's final decision on obligation of the match funds, the date of the
federal grant approval or denial, and whether the eligible project was approved or denied[;
and
12. Any other information requested by the cabinet].
(2) By November 1, 2024, and annually thereafter until November 1, 2026, the cabinet shall prepare an annual
report of the GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of
2024] to be submitted to the Governor and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and
made available on the cabinet's website. The annual report shall include but not be limited to the following:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) A summary of the monthly reports and the eligible grant[match] applications received and relevant
statistics relating to actions taken by the cabinet and grants awarded, including the applicant, award
amount, and the purpose of the funding;
(b) The current balance of the GRANT Program[Government Resources Accelerating Needed
Transformation Program of 2024] fund;
(c) Recommendations regarding appropriations to the GRANT Program[Government Resources
Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024] fund for the upcoming fiscal year; and
(d) Recommendations for legislation or policy actions needed to facilitate greater receipt of grant funding
to eligible grant applicants[recipients].
Section 7. The following KRS sections are repealed:
154.14-010 Purpose of Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024.
154.14-080 GRANT Commission -- Membership -- Meetings -- Staffing.
Section 8. Whereas the GRANT program is available for a limited time period and administrative
efficiency requires that funding be allocated immediately, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.